Hawaii statutes.
§206-4 General powers. The board of
land and natural resources shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to
carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter,
including, without limitation, the following powers in addition to others
herein granted:

(1) To make and execute contracts and other
instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the board;

(2) To make, amend, or repeal any rule or regulation,
having the force and effect of law, in accordance with chapter 91;

(3) To prepare, carry out, and operate development
projects in any development area; and to provide for the construction,
reconstruction, improvement, alteration, or repair of any development project
or any part thereof;

(4) To provide for the regulation of development
projects financed by private funds and instituted under the terms of this
chapter;

(5) To sell, to lease, or to lease with option to
purchase lands; and

(6) In addition to all of the other powers conferred
upon it, to do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the powers
expressly given by this chapter. [L 1961, c 6, §5; am L 1965, c 96, §81; Supp,
§98J-5; HRS §206-4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next